el: Τύπος θηκαριού: Κουτί προβολής; Θήκη Kydex; Δερμάτινη θήκη; Μεταλλική θήκη; Κανένα; Νάιλον θήκη; Πλαστική θήκη; Θήκη παρουσίασης; Ξύλινη θήκη; Άλλο
en: Sheath type: Display box; Kydex sheath; Leather sheath; Metal sheath; None; Nylon sheath; Plastic sheath; Presentation case; Wooden sheath; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de bainha: Caixa de exibição; Bainha em Kydex; Bainha em pele; Bainha em metal; Nenhuma; Bainha em nylon; Bainha em plástico; Estojo de apresentação; Bainha de madeira; Outro
tr: Kılıf tipi: Sergileme kutusu; Kydex kılıf; Deri kılıf; Metal kılıf; Yok; Naylon kılıf; Plastik kılıf; Sunum kutusu; Ahşap kılıf; Diğer
vi: Loại vỏ: Hộp trưng bày; Bao Kydex; Bao da; Bao kim loại; Không có; Bao nylon; Bao nhựa; Hộp quà tặng; Bao gỗ; Khác
da: Type for knivskeden: Udstillingsæske; Kydex-skede; Læderskede; Metalskede; Ingen; Nylonskede; Plastikskede; Præsentationsæske; Træskede; Andet
th: ประเภทปลอก: กล่องตั้งโชว์; ปลอก Kydex; ปลอกหนัง; ปลอกโลหะ; ไม่มี; ปลอกไนลอน; ปลอกพลาสติก; กล่องพรีเซนเทชัน; ปลอกไม้; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de vaina: Caja de exhibición; Funda de Kydex; Funda de cuero; Funda de metal; Ninguno; Funda de nailon; Funda de plástico; Estuche de presentación; Funda de madera; Otro
pl: Rodzaj pochwy: Pudełko ekspozycyjne; Pochwa Kydex; Pochwa skórzana; Pochwa metalowa; Brak; Pochwa nylonowa; Pochwa plastikowa; Etui prezentowe; Pochwa drewniana; Inne
hu: Tok típusa: Bemutató doboz; Kydex tok; Bőrtok; Fémtok; Nincs; Nejlontok; Műanyag tok; Prezentációs tok; Fatok; Egyéb
sv: Typ av slida: Displaybox; Kydex-slida; Läderslida; Metallslida; Ingen; Nylonslida; Plastslida; Presentationslåda; Träslida; Övrigt
it: Tipo di fodero: Scatola da esposizione; Fodero in Kydex; Fodero in pelle; Fodero in metallo; Nessuno; Fodero in nylon; Fodero in plastica; Cofanetto di presentazione; Fodero in legno; Altro
sk-SK: Typ puzdra: Vitrína; Puzdro Kydex; Kožené puzdro; Kovové puzdro; Žiadne; Nylónové puzdro; Plastové puzdro; Prezentačné puzdro; Drevené puzdro; Iné
cs: Typ pochvy: Prezentační box; Pouzdro Kydex; Kožené pouzdro; Kovové pouzdro; Žádné; Nylonové pouzdro; Plastové pouzdro; Prezentační kazeta; Dřevěné pouzdro; Jiné
ru: Тип ножен: Витринная коробка; Ножны из Kydex; Кожаные ножны; Металлические ножны; Нет; Нейлоновые ножны; Пластиковые ножны; Подарочный футляр; Деревянные ножны; Другое
zh-TW: 刀鞘類型: 展示盒; Kydex 刀鞘; 皮革刀鞘; 金屬刀鞘; 無; 尼龍刀鞘; 塑膠刀鞘; 禮盒; 木製刀鞘; 其他
de: Scheidentyp: Präsentationsbox; Kydex-Scheide; Lederscheide; Metallscheide; Keine; Nylonscheide; Kunststoffscheide; Präsentationsetui; Holzscheide; Sonstige
pt-BR: Bainha tipo: Caixa de exibição; Bainha Kydex; Bainha de couro; Bainha de metal; Nenhum; Bainha de nylon; Bainha de plástico; Estojo de apresentação; Bainha de madeira; Outro
lt-LT: Makšties tipas: Eksponavimo dėžutė; Kydex dėklas; Odinis dėklas; Metalinis dėklas; Nėra; Nailoninis dėklas; Plastikinis dėklas; Pristatymo dėžutė; Medinis dėklas; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta nožnice: Razstavna škatla; Nožnica Kydex; Usnjena nožnica; Kovinska nožnica; Brez; Najlonska nožnica; Plastična nožnica; Predstavitveni kovček; Lesena nožnica; Drugo
ko: 칼집 유형: 디스플레이 박스; Kydex 시스; 가죽 시스; 금속 시스; 없음; 나일론 시스; 플라스틱 시스; 프레젠테이션 케이스; 목재 시스; 기타
ja: 鞘タイプ: ディスプレイボックス; Kydexシース; レザーシース; メタルシース; なし; ナイロンシース; プラスチックシース; プレゼンテーションケース; 木製シース; その他
nl: Schede type: Displaydoos; Kydex-schede; Leren schede; Metalen schede; Geen; Nylon schede; Plastic schede; Presentatiedoos; Houten schede; Overig
fi: Suojuksen tyyppi: Esittelylaatikko; Kydex-tuppi; Nahkatuppi; Metallituppi; Ei mitään; Nailontuppi; Muovituppi; Esittelykotelo; Puutuppi; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta korice: Izložbena kutija; Kydex futrola; Kožna futrola; Metalna futrola; Bez; Najlonska futrola; Plastična futrola; Prezentacijska kutija; Drvena futrola; Drugo
nb: Sliretype: Utstillingseske; Kydex-slire; Lærslire; Metallslire; Ingen; Nylonslire; Plastslire; Presentasjonseske; Treslire; Annet
zh-CN: 刀鞘类型: 展示盒; Kydex 鞘; 皮鞘; 金属鞘; 无; 尼龙鞘; 塑料鞘; 礼盒; 木鞘; 其他
bg-BG: Вид на ножницата: Витринна кутия; Ножница от Kydex; Кожена ножница; Метална ножница; Без; Найлонова ножница; Пластмасова ножница; Представителна кутия; Дървена ножница; Друго
fr: Type d’étui: Boîte de présentation; Étui en Kydex; Étui en cuir; Étui en métal; Aucun; Étui en nylon; Étui en plastique; Coffret de présentation; Étui en bois; Autre
ro-RO: Tipul de teacă: Cutie de expunere; Teacă Kydex; Teacă din piele; Teacă metalică; Niciuna; Teacă din nailon; Teacă din plastic; Cutie de prezentare; Teacă din lemn; Altele